Maryland, session 2026, SB0569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–4701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Controller” means a person that, alone or jointly with others, determines the
purpose and means of processing personal data.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0569*

SENATE BILL 569
(y) (1) “Process” means an operation or set of operations performed by manual
or automated means on personal data.
(2) “Process” includes collecting, using, storing, disclosing, analyzing,
[deleting,] or modifying personal data.
(3) “PROCESS” DOES NOT INCLUDE DELETING PERSONAL DATA OR
EFFORTS MADE TO IDENTIFY PERSONAL DATA SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
DELETION OR DATA MINIMIZATION.
14–4707.
(a) A controller may not:
(1) Except where the collection or processing is strictly necessary to provide
or maintain a specific product or service requested by the consumer to whom the personal
data pertains, collect, process, or share sensitive data concerning a consumer;
(2) Sell sensitive data;
(3) Process personal data in violation of State or federal laws that prohibit
unlawful discrimination;
(4) Process the personal data of a consumer for the purposes of targeted
advertising if the controller knew or should have known that the consumer is under the age
of 18 years;
(5) Sell the personal data of a consumer if the controller knew or should
have known that the consumer is under the age of 18 years;
(6) Discriminate against a consumer for exercising a consumer right
contained in this subtitle, including denying goods or services, charging different prices or
rates for goods or services, or providing a different level of quality of goods or services to
the consumer;
(7) Collect, process, or transfer personal data or publicly available data in
a manner that unlawfully discriminates in or otherwise unlawfully makes unavailable the
equal enjoyment of goods or services on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability, unless the collection, processing, or
transfer of personal data is for:
(i) The controller’s self–testing to prevent or mitigate unlawful
discrimination;
(ii) The controller’s diversifying of an applicant, participant, or
customer pool; or

SENATE BILL 569 3
(iii) A private club or group not open to the public, as described in §
201(e) of the Civil Rights Act of 1964; [or]
(8) Unless the controller obtains the consumer’s consent, process personal
data for a purpose that is neither reasonably necessary to, nor compatible with, the
disclosed purposes for which the personal data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer;
OR
(9) UNLESS THE CONTROLLER OBTAINS THE CONSUMER’S CONSENT,
COLLECT, PROCESS, SHARE, OR SELL PRECISE GEOLOCATION DATA FOR THE
PURPOSE OF TARGETED ADVERTISING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.